Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-154
Adjustments to the cost of credentialing.

Adjustments to the cost of credentialing include, but are not limited to:

(1) Revenue from sources that include, but are not limited to:

(a) Interest earned on the Professional and Occupational Credentialing Cash Fund, if any;

(b) Certification and verification of credentials;

(c) Administrative fees;

(d) Reinstatement fees;

(e) General Funds and federal funds;

(f) Fees for miscellaneous services, such as production of photocopies, lists, labels, and diskettes;

(g) Gifts; and

(h) Grants;

(2) Transfers to other funds for costs related to the Nebraska Regulation of Health Professions Act and section 38-128; and

(3) Costs associated with subsection (3) of section 38-155.

Laws 2003, LB 242, § 26;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-162.03;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 54;

Laws 2019, LB112, § 9.

Nebraska Regulation of Health Professions Act, see section 71-6201.